Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Article 4. Warranties.

§ 59.1-504.1.
Warranty and obligations concerning noninterference and noninfringement.

A licensor of information that is a merchant regularly dealing in information of the kind warrants that the information will be delivered free of the rightful claim of any third person by way of infringement or misappropriation, but a licensee that furnishes
detailed specifications to the licensor and the method required for meeting the specifications holds the licensor harmless against any such claim that arises out of compliance with either the required specification or the required
method except for a claim that results from the failure of the licensor to adopt, or notify the licensee of, a noninfringing alternative of which the licensor had reason to know.

A licensor warrants:

for the duration of the license, that no person holds a rightful claim to, or interest in, the information which arose from an act or omission of the licensor, other than a claim by way of infringement or misappropriation, which will interfere with the
licensee’s enjoyment of its interest; and

as to rights granted exclusively to the licensee, that within the scope of the license:

to the knowledge of the licensor, any licensed patent rights are valid and exclusive to the extent exclusivity and validity are recognized by the law under which the patent rights were created; and

in all other cases, the licensed informational rights are valid and exclusive for the information as a whole to the extent exclusivity and validity are recognized by the law applicable to the licensed rights in a jurisdiction to which the license applies.

The warranties in this section are subject to the following rules:

If the licensed informational rights are subject to a right of privileged use, collective administration, or compulsory licensing, the warranty is not made with respect to those rights.

The obligations under subsections (a) and (b) (2) apply solely to informational rights arising under the laws of the United States or a state, unless the contract expressly provides that the warranty obligations extend to rights under the laws of other
countries. Language is sufficient for this purpose if it states, “The licensor warrants exclusivity, noninfringement, in specified countries, worldwide,” or words of similar import. In that case, the warranty extends to
the specified country or, in the case of a reference to “worldwide” or the like, to all countries within the description, but only to the extent the rights are recognized under a treaty or international convention to which
the country and the United States are signatories.

The warranties under subsections (a) and (b) (2) are not made by a license that merely permits use, or covenants not to claim infringement because of the use, of rights under a licensed patent.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e), a warranty under this section may be disclaimed or modified only by specific language or by circumstances that give the licensee reason to know that the licensor does not warrant that competing claims do
not exist or that the licensor purports to grant only the rights it may have. An obligation to hold harmless under subsection (a) may be disclaimed or modified only by specific language or by circumstances giving the licensor reason
to know that the licensee does not provide a hold-harmless obligation to the licensor. In an automated transaction, language is sufficient if it is conspicuous. Otherwise, language in a record is sufficient if it states:

as to the licensor’s obligation, “There is no warranty against interference with your enjoyment of the information or against infringement,” or words of similar import; or

as to the licensee’s obligation, “There is no obligation to hold you harmless from any actions taken in compliance with the specifications or methods furnished to me under this contract,” or words of similar import.

Between merchants, a grant of a “quitclaim,” or a grant in similar terms, grants the information or informational rights without an implied warranty as to infringement or misappropriation or as to the rights actually possessed or transferred by the licensor.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996; 2004, c. 794.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Code Commission, Parts have been changed to Articles in this chapter to correct the 2000 acts.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 794 inserted the second sentence in subsection (d), divided the former third sentence of subsection (d) into present subdivision (d) (1) and added “as to the licensor’s obligation” to the beginning and “or” at the end; and added
subdivision (d) (2).

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

§ 59.1-504.2.
Express warranty.

Subject to subsection (c), an express warranty by a licensor is created as follows:

An affirmation of fact or promise made by the licensor to its licensee, including by advertising, which relates to the information and becomes part of the basis of the bargain creates an express warranty that the information to be furnished under the
agreement will conform to the affirmation or promise.

Any description of the information which is made part of the basis of the bargain creates an express warranty that the information will conform to the description.

Any sample, model, or demonstration of a final product which is made part of the basis of the bargain creates an express warranty that the performance of the information will reasonably conform to the performance of the sample, model, or demonstration,
taking into account differences that would appear to a reasonable person in the position of the licensee between the sample, model, or demonstration and the information as it will be used.

It is not necessary to the creation of an express warranty that the licensor use formal words, such as “warranty” or “guaranty”, or state a specific intention to make a warranty. However, an express warranty is not created by:

an affirmation or prediction merely of the value of the information or informational rights;

a display or description of a portion of the information to illustrate the aesthetics, appeal, suitability to taste, subjective quality, or the like of informational content; or

a statement purporting to be merely opinion or commendation of the information or informational rights.

An express warranty or similar express contractual obligation, if any, exists with respect to published informational content covered by this chapter to the same extent that it would exist if the published informational content had been published in a
form that placed it outside this chapter. However, if the warranty or similar express contractual obligation is breached, the remedies of the aggrieved party are those under this chapter and the agreement.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

§ 59.1-504.3.
Implied warranty; merchantability of computer program.

Unless the warranty is disclaimed or modified, a licensor that is a merchant with respect to computer programs of the kind warrants:

to the end user that the computer program is fit for the ordinary purposes for which such computer programs are used;

to the distributor that:

the program is adequately packaged and labeled as the agreement requires; and

in the case of multiple copies, the copies are within the variations permitted by the agreement, of even kind, quality, and quantity within each unit and among all units involved; and

that the program conforms to any promises or affirmations of fact made on the container or label.

Unless disclaimed or modified, other implied warranties with respect to computer programs may arise from course of dealing or usage of trade.

No warranty is created under this section with respect to informational content, but an implied warranty may arise under § 59.1-504.4.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

§ 59.1-504.4.
Implied warranty; informational content.

Unless the warranty is disclaimed or modified, a merchant that, in a special relationship of reliance with a licensee, collects, compiles, processes, provides, or transmits informational content warrants to that licensee that there is no inaccuracy in
the informational content caused by the merchant’s failure to perform with reasonable care.

A warranty does not arise under subsection (a) with respect to:

subjective characteristics of the informational content, such as the aesthetics, appeal, and suitability to taste;

published informational content; or

a person that acts as a conduit or provides no more than editorial services in collecting, compiling, distributing, processing, providing, or transmitting informational content that under the circumstances can be identified as that of a third person.

The warranty under this section is not subject to the preclusion in § 59.1-501.15 (b) (1) on disclaiming obligations of diligence, reasonableness, or care.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996; 2004, c. 794.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 794 added present subdivision (b) (1); redesignated former subdivisions (b) (1) and (b) (2) as present subdivisions (b) (2) and (b) (3); and substituted “§ 59.1-501.15 (b) (1)” for “§ 59.1-501.13 (a) (1)” in subsection (c).

§ 59.1-504.5.
Implied warranty; licensee’s purpose; system integration.

Unless the warranty is disclaimed or modified, if a licensor at the time of contracting has reason to know any particular purpose for which the computer information is required and that the licensee is relying on the licensor’s skill or judgment to select,
develop, or furnish suitable information, the following rules apply:

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2), there is an implied warranty that the information is fit for that purpose.

If from all the circumstances it appears that the licensor was to be paid for the amount of its time or effort regardless of the fitness of the resulting information, the warranty under paragraph (1) is that the information will not fail to achieve the
licensee’s particular purpose as a result of the licensor’s lack of reasonable effort.

There is no warranty under subsection (a) with regard to:

the aesthetics, appeal, suitability to taste, or subjective quality of informational content; or

published informational content, but there may be a warranty with regard to the licensor’s selection among published informational content from different providers if the selection is made by an individual acting as or on behalf of the licensor.

If an agreement requires a licensor to provide or select a system consisting of computer programs and goods, and the licensor has reason to know that the licensee is relying on the skill or judgment of the licensor to select the components of the system,
there is an implied warranty that the components provided or selected will function together as a system.

The warranty under this section is not subject to the preclusion in § 59.1-501.15 (b) (1) on disclaiming diligence, reasonableness, or care.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996; 2004, c. 794.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 794 substituted “§ 59.1-501.15 (b) (1)” for “§ 59.1-501.13 (a) (1)” in subsection (d).

§ 59.1-504.6.
Disclaimer or modification of warranty.

Words or conduct relevant to the creation of an express warranty and words or conduct tending to disclaim or modify an express warranty must be construed wherever reasonable as consistent with each other. Subject to § 59.1-503.1 with regard to parol or
extrinsic evidence, the disclaimer or modification is inoperative to the extent that such construction is unreasonable.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c), (d), and (e), to disclaim or modify an implied warranty or any part of it, but not the warranty in § 59.1-504.1, the following rules apply:

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection:

To disclaim or modify the implied warranty arising under § 59.1-504.3, language must mention “merchantability” or “quality” or use words of similar import and, if in a record, must be conspicuous.

To disclaim or modify the implied warranty arising under § 59.1-504.4, language in a record must mention “accuracy” or use words of similar import.

Language to disclaim or modify the implied warranty arising under § 59.1-504.5 must be in a record and be conspicuous. It is sufficient to state, “There is no warranty that this information, our efforts, or the system will fulfill any of your particular
purposes or needs,” or words of similar import.

Language in a record is sufficient to disclaim all implied warranties if it individually disclaims each implied warranty or, except for the warranty in § 59.1-504.1, if it is conspicuous and states, “Except for express warranties stated in this contract,
if any, this information, computer program is provided with all faults, and the entire risk as to satisfactory quality, performance, accuracy, and effort is with the user,” or words of similar import.

A disclaimer or modification sufficient under Title 8.2 or 8.2A to disclaim or modify an implied warranty of merchantability is sufficient to disclaim or modify the warranties under §§ 59.1-504.3 and 59.1-504.4. A disclaimer or modification sufficient
under Title 8.2 or 8.2A to disclaim or modify an implied warranty of fitness for a particular purpose is sufficient to disclaim or modify the warranties under § 59.1-504.5.

Unless the circumstances indicate otherwise, all implied warranties, but not the warranty under § 59.1-504.1, are disclaimed by expressions like “as is” or “with all faults” or other language that in common understanding calls the licensee’s attention
to the disclaimer of warranties and makes plain that there are no implied warranties.

If a licensee before entering into a contract has examined the information or the sample or model as fully as he desired or has refused to examine the information, there is no implied warranty with regard to defects that an examination ought in the circumstances
to have revealed to the licensee.

An implied warranty may also be disclaimed or modified by course of performance, course of dealing, or usage of trade.

If a contract requires ongoing performance or a series of performances by the licensor, language of disclaimer or modification which complies with this section is effective with respect to all performances under the contract.

Remedies for breach of warranty may be limited in accordance with this chapter with respect to liquidation or limitation of damages and contractual modification of remedy.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

§ 59.1-504.7.
Modification of computer program.

A licensee that modifies a computer program, other than by using a capability of the program intended for that purpose in the ordinary course, does not invalidate any warranty regarding performance of an unmodified copy but does invalidate any warranties,
express or implied, regarding performance of the modified copy. A modification occurs if a licensee alters code in, deletes code from, or adds code to the computer program.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

§ 59.1-504.8.
Cumulation and conflict of warranties.

Warranties, whether express or implied, must be construed as consistent with each other and as cumulative, but if that construction is unreasonable, the intention of the parties determines which warranty is dominant. In ascertaining that intention, the
following rules apply:

Exact or technical specifications displace an inconsistent sample or model or general language of description.

A sample displaces inconsistent general language of description.

Express warranties displace inconsistent implied warranties other than an implied warranty under § 59.1-504.5 (a).

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

§ 59.1-504.9.
Third-party beneficiaries of warranty.

Except for published informational content, a warranty to a licensee extends to persons for whose benefit the licensor intends to supply the information or informational rights and which rightfully use the information in a transaction or application of
a kind in which the licensor intends the information to be used.

A warranty to a consumer extends to each individual consumer in the licensee’s immediate family or household if the individual’s use would have been reasonably expected by the licensor.

A contractual term that excludes or limits the persons to which a warranty extends is effective except as to individuals described in subsection (b).

A disclaimer or modification of a warranty or remedy which is effective against the licensee is also effective against third persons to which a warranty extends under this section.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

§ 59.1-504.10.
No implied warranties for free software.

In this section, “free software” means a computer program with respect to which the licensor does not intend to make a profit from the distribution of the copy of the program and does not act generally for commercial gain derived from controlling use
of the program or making, modifying, or redistributing copies of the program.

The warranties under §§ 59.1-504.1 and 59.1-504.3 do not apply to free software.

History.
2004, c. 794.

§§ 59.1-504.11 through 59.1-505.
Reserved.